Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 4.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201085-1901
Act, how cited.

Sections
85-1901 to 85-1920 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Opportunity Grant Act.

Laws 2003, LB 574, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB956, § 4.